South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3474.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 58-23-1610(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2)(a) "Personal vehicle" means a vehicle that is used by a transportation network company driver in connection with providing a prearranged ride and is: (a)(i) owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by the transportation network company driver; and (b)(ii) not a taxi, or charter bus, charter limousine, or for-hire vehicle. (b) A personal vehicle may be, but is not required to be, registered or licensed as a charter limousine with the South Carolina Public Service Commission or as a limousine or other for-hire vehicle by the governing body of a county or city. SECTION 2.  Section 58-23-1610(9) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (9) "Prearranged ride" means the provision of transportation by a transportation network company driver to a transportation network company rider, beginning when a driver accepts a ride requested by a rider through a digital network controlled by a transportation network company, continuing while the driver transports a requesting rider, and ending when the last requesting rider departs from the personal vehicle. A prearranged ride does not include shared expense carpool or vanpool arrangements, or transportation provided using a taxi, limousine, or other for-hire vehicle pursuant to a Class C certificate issued by the South Carolina Public Service Commission or pursuant to a license issued by the governing body of a county or city. A prearranged ride does not include services provided pursuant to Articles 1 through 15, Chapter 23, Title 58 or arranging nonemergency medical transportation for individuals qualifying for Medicaid or Medicare pursuant to a contract with the State or a managed care organization. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----